Maryland, session 2026, HB0702.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–20B–05.
(i) (4) (i) 1. IN THIS PARAGRAPH THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE
THE MEANINGS INDICATED.
2. “CONDOMINIUM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
11–101 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0702*

HOUSE BILL 702
3. “COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 5–6B–01 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS
ARTICLE.
4. “RESIDENTIAL DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMER” INCLUDES
A MEMBER OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION AND AN OWNER OF A
CONDOMINIUM UNIT.
(II) Subject to subparagraphs [(ii), (iii), and (iv)] (III) THROUGH (VI)
of this paragraph, compliance fees paid under § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article may be
used to provide grants to electric companies to be refunded or credited to each residential
distribution customer based on the customer’s consumption of electricity supply that is
subject to the renewable energy portfolio standard.
[(ii)] (III) [The] FOR A RESIDENTIAL DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMER
OTHER THAN A MEMBER OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION OR A UNIT
OWNER OF A CONDOMINIUM, THE refunding or crediting of amounts to residential
distribution customers shall be identified on the customer’s bill as a line item identified as
a “legislative energy relief refund”.
(IV) FOR A MEMBER OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION OR A UNIT OWNER OF A CONDOMINIUM:
1. THE ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL ISSUE A REFUND OR
CREDIT TO THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION
OR THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE CONDOMINIUM; AND
2. THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE COOPERATIVE
HOUSING CORPORATION OR THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE CONDOMINIUM
SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE REFUND OR CREDIT TO THE MEMBERS OF THE
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION OR UNIT OWNERS OF THE CONDOMINIUM.
[(iii)] (V) An electric company awarded a grant under this
paragraph:
1. may not retain any of the grant funds to cover overhead
expenses; and
2. shall provide all of the grant funds to residential
distribution customers.
[(iv)] (VI) The process under subparagraphs [(i) and] (II), (III), AND
(IV) of this paragraph related to the refunding or crediting of amounts to residential
distribution customers shall be directed and overseen by the Commission.

HOUSE BILL 702 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, from the alternative
compliance fees paid into the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund in accordance
with § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article, a portion shall be used to provide grant awards
to electric companies, including electric cooperatives and municipal electric utilities, to be
refunded or credited to residential distribution customers for electric service in fiscal year
2027 in accordance with subsection (b) of this section if the customers:
(i) are members of cooperative housing corporations or unit owners
of condominiums; and
(ii) did not receive the refund or credit required under Section 11 of
Chapters 625 and 626 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025.
(2) The Governor may transfer by budget amendment the funds described
in paragraph (1) of this subsection to the Public Service Commission to be awarded to
electric companies, including electric cooperatives and municipal electric utilities.
(3) Refunds or credits made under this section shall be in addition to
refunds or credits made to members of cooperative housing corporations or unit owners of
condominiums in fiscal year 2027 under § 9–20B–05(i)(4) of the State Government Article,
as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(b) The funds described in subsection (a)(1) of this section shall be distributed:
(1) in accordance with § 9–20B–05(i)(4) of the State Government Article,
as enacted by Section 1 of this Act;
(2) in amounts per residential distribution customer calculated in the same
manner as a distribution would have been calculated in fiscal year 2026; and
(3) to distribution customers that are members of cooperative housing
corporations or unit owners of condominiums as follows:
(i) half of the amount granted under subsection (a)(1) of this section
to be refunded or credited during a peak summer month; and
(ii) half of the amount granted under subsection (a)(1) of this section
to be refunded or credited during a peak winter month.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.